New York, session 2025-2026, A11571.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of chapter 801 of the laws of 2021, amending the 2 state administrative procedure act relating to public hearings on 3 proposed rules, as amended by chapter 321 of the laws of 2025, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 § 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2023, and shall expire 6 and be deemed repealed on January 1, [2027] 2028, and shall apply to all 7 rules for which a notice of proposed rule making or a description in a 8 regulatory agenda is published during such time period. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16005-02-6